Washington statutes.
RCW 7.36.120

Hearing—Determination.

The court or judge shall thereupon proceed in a summary way to hear and determine the cause, and if no legal cause be shown for the restraint or for the continuation thereof, shall discharge the party.

[Code 1881 s 676; 1877 p 139 s 679; 1869 p 157 s 616; 1854 p 213 s 444; RRS s 1074.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: ER 1101.